Illinois, session 104th, HB5519.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Plumbing License Law is amended by 5changing Section 13.1 as follows: 6    (225 ILCS 320/13.1)7    Sec. 13.1. Plumbing contractors; registration; 8applications. 9    (1) On and after May 1, 2002, all persons or corporations 10desiring to engage in the business of plumbing contractor, 11other than any entity that maintains an audited net worth of 12shareholders' equity equal to or exceeding $100,000,000, shall 13register in accordance with the provisions of this Act.14    (2) Applications Application for registration shall be 15filed with the Department each year, on or before the last day 16of September, in writing and on forms prepared and furnished 17by the Department. All plumbing contractor registrations 18expire on the last day of September of each year. The 19Department shall provide notices to each licensee regarding 20application for registration on or before July 1 of each year. 21The Department shall accept application materials on and after 22July 1 of each year. 23    (3) Applications shall contain the name, address, and   HB5519- 2 -LRB104 17612 AAS 31043 b1telephone number of the person and the plumbing license of (i) 2the individual, if a sole proprietorship; (ii) the partner, if 3a partnership; or (iii) an officer, if a corporation. The 4application shall contain the business name, address, and 5telephone number, a current copy of the plumbing license, and 6any other information the Department may require by rule.7    (4) Applicants shall submit an original certificate of 8insurance documenting that the contractor carries general 9liability insurance with a minimum of $100,000 per occurrence, 10a minimum of $300,000 aggregate for bodily injury, property 11damage insurance with a minimum of $50,000 or a minimum of 12$300,000 combined single limit, and workers compensation 13insurance with a minimum $500,000 employer's liability. No 14registration may be issued in the absence of this certificate. 15Certificates must be in force at all times for registration to 16remain valid.17    (5) Applicants shall submit, on a form provided by the 18Department, an indemnification bond in the amount of $20,000 19or a letter of credit in the same amount for work performed in 20accordance with this Act and the rules promulgated under this 21Act.22    (5.5) The Department, upon notification by the Illinois 23Workers' Compensation Commission or the Department of 24Insurance, shall refuse the issuance or renewal of a license 25to, or suspend or revoke the license of, any individual, 26corporation, partnership, or other business entity that has   HB5519- 3 -LRB104 17612 AAS 31043 b1been found by the Illinois Workers' Compensation Commission or 2the Department of Insurance to have failed: 3        (a) to secure workers' compensation obligations in the 4    manner required by subsections (a) and (b) of Section 4 of 5    the Workers' Compensation Act; 6        (b) to pay in full a fine or penalty imposed by the 7    Illinois Workers' Compensation Commission or the 8    Department of Insurance due to a failure to secure 9    workers' compensation obligations in the manner required 10    by subsections (a) and (b) of Section 4 of the Workers' 11    Compensation Act; or 12        (c) to fulfill all obligations assumed pursuant to any 13    settlement reached with the Illinois Workers' Compensation 14    Commission or the Department of Insurance due to a failure 15    to secure workers' compensation obligations in the manner 16    required by subsections (a) and (b) of Section 4 of the 17    Workers' Compensation Act. 18    A complaint filed with the Department by the Illinois 19Workers' Compensation Commission or the Department of 20Insurance that includes a certification, signed by its 21Director or Chairman or designee, attesting to a finding of 22the failure to secure workers' compensation obligations in the 23manner required by subsections (a) and (b) of Section 4 of the 24Workers' Compensation Act or the failure to pay any fines or 25penalties or to discharge any obligation under a settlement 26relating to the failure to secure workers' compensation   HB5519- 4 -LRB104 17612 AAS 31043 b1obligations in the manner required by subsections (a) and (b) 2of Section 4 of the Workers' Compensation Act is prima facie 3evidence of the licensee's or applicant's failure to comply 4with subsections (a) and (b) of Section 4 of the Workers' 5Compensation Act. Upon receipt of that certification, the 6Department shall, without a hearing, immediately suspend all 7licenses held by the licensee or the processing of any 8application from the applicant. Enforcement of the 9Department's order shall be stayed for 60 days. The Department 10shall provide notice of the suspension to the licensee by 11mailing a copy of the Department's order to the licensee's or 12applicant's address of record or emailing a copy of the order 13to the licensee's or applicant's email address of record. The 14notice shall advise the licensee or applicant that the 15suspension shall be effective 60 days after the issuance of 16the order unless the Department receives, from the licensee or 17applicant, a request for a hearing before the Department to 18dispute the matters contained in the order.19    Upon receiving notice from the Illinois Workers' 20Compensation Commission or the Department of Insurance that 21the violation has been corrected or otherwise resolved, the 22Department shall vacate the order suspending a licensee's 23license or the processing of an applicant's application.24    No license shall be suspended or revoked until after the 25licensee is afforded any due process protection guaranteed by 26statute or rule adopted by the Illinois Workers' Compensation   HB5519- 5 -LRB104 17612 AAS 31043 b1Commission or the Department of Insurance. 2    (6) All employees of a registered plumbing contractor who 3engage in plumbing work shall be licensed plumbers or 4apprentice plumbers in accordance with this Act.5    (7) Plumbing contractors shall submit an annual 6registration fee in an amount to be established by rule.7    (8) The Department shall be notified in advance of any 8changes in the business structure, name, or location or of the 9addition or deletion of the owner or officer who is the 10licensed plumber listed on the application. Failure to notify 11the Department of this information is grounds for suspension 12or revocation of the plumbing contractor's registration.13    (9) In the event that the plumber's license on the 14application for registration of a plumbing contractor is a 15license issued by the City of Chicago, it shall be the 16responsibility of the applicant to forward a copy of the 17plumber's license to the Department, noting the name of the 18registered plumbing contractor, when it is renewed. In the 19event that the plumbing contractor's registration is suspended 20or revoked, the Department shall notify the City of Chicago 21and any corresponding plumbing contractor's license issued by 22the City of Chicago shall be suspended or revoked. 23(Source: P.A. 103-26, eff. 1-1-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24.)